Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 3. Point System and Driver Improvement.

Sec. 28.15.221.
Point system.

For the purpose of identifying habitually reckless or negligent drivers and habitual or frequent violators of traffic laws, the commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing a uniform system for the suspension, revocation, limitation, or denial of a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license by assigning demerit points for convictions for violations of traffic laws that are required to be reported to the department under AS

28.15.191

and AS

28.37.130

.

The regulations adopted under (a) of this section shall include a designated level of point accumulation which identifies drivers who are habitually reckless or negligent or who are habitual or frequent violators of traffic laws, so as to show a disrespect for traffic laws and a disregard for the safety of other persons. In formulating the point system authorized by this section, the commissioner shall, in the interest of interstate uniformity, provide for suspension, revocation or denial of a driver’s license, privilege to drive, or privilege to obtain a license for an accumulation of 12 or more points as a result of offenses committed during any consecutive 12-month period or 18 or more points as a result of offenses committed during any 24-month period.

The regulations adopted under (a) of this section shall include a two-point addition to a licensee’s assessed total if the licensee, while in a designated traffic safety corridor, overtakes and passes another vehicle in a zone designated by a safety control device that prohibits passing.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 21 ch 119 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For traffic offenses demerit point system, see 2 AAC 90, art. 5.

Sec. 28.15.225.
Limited license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.230.
Right of appeal. [Repealed, § 13 ch 17 SLA 1964.]

Sec. 28.15.231.
Assessment of points; driver improvement interview.

Notice of each assessment of points may be given, but notice shall be given when the point accumulation reaches 50 percent of the number at which suspension, revocation, or denial is required under AS

28.15.221(b)

, and a driver who has reached that level of point accumulation shall be identified as a problem driver. The department may require a problem driver to appear for a driver improvement interview. The purpose of that interview is to assist the person who is identified as a problem driver in overcoming substandard driving habits. An interview under this subsection is to be conducted in an informal manner. A driver shall comply with any reasonable recommendations designed to improve the driver’s driving abilities that are made to the driver during the interview.

Points may not be assessed for violating a provision of a state law or regulation or a municipal ordinance regulating standing, parking, equipment, size, or weight; nor may points be assessed for violations by pedestrians, passengers, or bicycle riders, or for violations of provisions relating to the preservation of the condition of traffic-control devices on the highways. Points shall be assessed for violations of oversize or overweight permits relating only to restrictions upon speed or hours of operation.

If a licensee is convicted of two or more traffic violations committed on a single occasion, the licensee shall be assessed points for one offense only, and if the offenses involved have different point values, the licensee shall be assessed for the offense having the greater point value.

The time periods provided for in this section for the accumulation of points shall be based upon the date of violation, but points may not be assessed until after conviction, either upon a plea of guilty, nolo contendere, or a forfeiture of bail, or as a result of a trial, for violation of the traffic laws.

The points assessed and the application of them against the licensee by the department under this section are in addition to, and not in substitution for, other provisions of this chapter and are not a substitute for any penalty imposed by a court.

The notice required under (a) of this section may be given by first class mail.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 15 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 2002; am § 36 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For traffic offenses demerit point system, see 2 AAC 90, art. 5.

Sec. 28.15.240.
Suspending licenses of juveniles. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.241.
Reduction of points.

Two points shall be deducted from a licensee’s assessed total if the licensee has not been convicted of a violation of traffic laws that occurred during the 12-month period after the date of the last violation of which the licensee was convicted.

In addition to (a) of this section, two points shall be deducted from the assessed total upon the driver’s furnishing to the department adequate proof of successful completion, within 12 months of the date of the driver’s last violation, of a driver improvement course approved by the department or an alcohol information course approved by the Department of Health and Social Services, except that

not more than one driver improvement or one alcohol information course may be used to obtain a reduction in points in any 12-month period; and

a driver improvement course for a person under 21 years of age must be a course that is designed to benefit persons under 21 years of age and must be certified by a national organization.

One point shall accumulate to the driver’s benefit for each 12 consecutive months of licensed, violation-free driving within the five-year period preceding the point calculation.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1981; am § 9 ch 93 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For traffic offenses demerit point system, see 2 AAC 90, art. 5.

Sec. 28.15.250.
Reexamination. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.251.
Suspension, revocation, limitation, or denial of driver’s license.

The department shall suspend, revoke, limit, deny, or initiate other remedial action against the driver’s license of a person, upon the person’s failure to

appear for a driver improvement interview under AS

28.15.231(a)

; or

comply with reasonable recommendations designed to improve the person’s driving abilities that are made to the person during the driver improvement interview.

The department shall suspend, revoke, or deny a driver’s license of a person who has been identified through the person’s point accumulation as an habitual or frequent violator under AS

28.15.221

.

A suspension, revocation, limitation, or denial of, or other action against, a driver’s license under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

may not be for more than one year.

If a driver’s license is suspended or revoked upon the accumulation of the number of points that requires that action under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

and regulations adopted under those sections, a limited license may not be issued to that person during the period of suspension or revocation.

Except for immediate action under AS

28.15.181

, when the department proposes to take action against a driver’s license under (b) of this section, it shall notify the licensee that the proposed action shall become effective 30 days from the date of the notice, except that the licensee shall have the right, within the 30-day period, to make an oral or written answer or statement in which the licensee may controvert any point or issue and the licensee may present evidence and arguments for the consideration of the department pertinent to the action to be taken or the grounds for the action.

Upon receipt of an oral or written answer or statement from the licensee, the department shall make findings on the matter under consideration and shall notify the person involved of its decision in writing by registered mail. If the department’s decision is to sustain an action against the licensee’s driver’s license, the department shall notify the licensee of the opportunity for a hearing under AS

28.05.121

—

28.05.141

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For traffic offenses demerit point system, see 2 AAC 90, art. 5.

Sec. 28.15.253.
Driver improvement or alcohol information courses.

Upon conviction of a violation of a traffic law that results in a driver accumulating six or more points from offenses committed during any consecutive 12-month period or nine or more points from offenses committed during any 24-month period, (1) on request of the department, the court may, in addition to any other penalty authorized by law, require the driver to successfully complete a driver improvement course approved by the department or an alcohol information course approved by the Department of Health and Social Services within a period of time prescribed by the court; and (2) the department shall require a person licensed under a provisional license to complete a driver improvement course approved by the department within a time period prescribed by the department. A driver improvement course approved under this section for a person who is under 21 years of age must be a course that is designed to benefit persons under 21 years of age and must be certified by a national organization. The department may suspend, revoke, or deny the driver’s license of a person who fails to successfully complete the driver improvement course or the alcohol information course required by the court under this section within the prescribed time period.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 93 SLA 1998)

Sec. 28.15.255.
Proof of financial responsibility.

The department may not reinstate a driver’s license that has been revoked or suspended under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

until the person whose license has been revoked or suspended provides proof of financial responsibility for the future.

If a driver accumulates six or more points under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

during a 12-month period, the department may require the driver to provide proof of financial responsibility for the future as a condition of retaining a driver’s license, and may suspend the driver’s license until proof of financial responsibility is provided.

In this section, the term “proof of financial responsibility” has the meaning given in AS

28.20.630

and may be established as provided in AS 28.20.

History.

(§ 2 ch 78 SLA 1982; am § 26 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Sec. 28.15.260.
Period of suspension. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.261.
Definitions for AS 28.15.221 — 28.15.261.

In AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

,

“licensee” includes an applicant for a new driver’s license if the applicant’s license was revoked under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

;

“traffic laws” means statutes, regulations, and municipal ordinances governing the driving or movement of vehicles.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 24 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs were renumbered in 1984 to achieve alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, deleted “, but is not limited to,” before “an applicant” in (1).

Sec. 28.15.270.
Surrender of license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]